Utah statutes.
59-1-902.   Organization -- Vacancies.
(1)  The governor shall appoint a chairperson and the review commission shall
select other officers as needed.
(2) (a)  If one of the members appointed by the speaker of the House of
Representatives resigns, is unable to serve, or ceases to be a member of the
House of Representatives, a vacancy occurs and it shall be filled by the
speaker of the House of Representatives.
(b)  If one of the members appointed by the president of the Senate resigns,
is unable to serve, or ceases to be a member of the Senate, a vacancy occurs
and it shall be filled by the president of the Senate.
(c)  If one of the members appointed by the governor resigns or is unable to
serve, the vacancy shall be filled by the governor.
(d)  If one of the members appointed by the review commission resigns or is
unable to serve, the vacancy shall be filled by the commission.
